Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
CHAPTER 4 Fish

Cross references.

Penalty for unlawful taking of fish generally, §

27-1-3

.

Rights to shellfish in nonnavigable tidewaters, §

44-8-6

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Fishing regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-3.